Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 83

Emergency Volunteer Reserve Act of 1985

12-83-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the Emergency Volunteer Reserve Act of 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 115, § 1; 1995, No. 169, § 1.

Cross References. Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, §§12-75-109 —12-75-111.

12-83-102. Policy and purpose.

Because the potential for a natural, technological, or national emergency-related disaster of catastrophic proportions and devastating impact requires extensive use of highly trained and skilled personnel experienced in disaster response and recovery actions, and whereas such needs and requirements may exceed the normal forces available to the State of Arkansas to prevent death and injury to its citizens and extensive loss of property, it is found and declared necessary:

To establish within the Division of Emergency Management an Emergency Volunteer Reserve Cadre of persons trained and experienced in certain functions related to disaster response and recovery operations;

To provide authority to the Director of the Division of Emergency Management to call the emergency volunteer reserve personnel into active service upon declaration of a state of disaster emergency by the Governor or the President of the United States or when, in the opinion of the director, a pending natural, technological, or national emergency may require the immediate services of the personnel;

To provide the authority to the director to reimburse members of the cadre, when called to active duty, for out-of-pocket expenses for lodging, food, and travel at the current rate and under the provisions for reimbursement applicable to state employees of like grade and responsibility during the period of active service to the state; and

To provide to the cadre the same privileges and immunities as are applicable to state employees when performing their duties on behalf of the state.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (1), (2), and (3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (1) and (2).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 115, § 2; 1995, No. 169, § 2; 1999, No. 646, § 49; 2019, No. 910, §
5913.

12-83-103. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management, including any acting director, when such position is authorized by the Governor, and those persons officially authorized to act for the director in his or her absence or incapacitation; and

“Emergency Volunteer Reserve Cadre” means persons recruited as volunteers to serve in time of emergency and to supplement the regular employees of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management in disaster response and recovery operations.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (1) and (2).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 115, § 3; 1995, No. 169, § 3; 1999, No. 646, § 50.

12-83-104. Recruitment — Service — Deployment — Discharge.

The Division of Emergency Management shall establish a system to recruit personnel with special skills or experience related to emergency response and recovery operations and provide initial familiarization training and periodic proficiency training as necessary for members of the Emergency Volunteer Reserve Cadre to ensure their readiness for immediate deployment for response and recovery activities.

The personnel shall be enrolled as emergency responder volunteers in accordance with § 12-75-129, and shall be eligible for immunities and exemptions in accordance with § 12-75-128 and workers' compensation benefits in accordance with § 12-75-129.

The division shall establish an administrative management system to recruit and maintain qualified personnel and establish a fiscal management system to ensure prompt and reasonable reimbursement of authorized expenses.

Persons recruited for the cadre may provide, but are not limited to providing, services in disaster application centers, disaster field offices, disaster survey teams, and fixed or mobile emergency operating centers and communications facilities, and may utilize other specific skills for which they may qualify or be trained to assume.

Members are subject to deployment within the State of Arkansas and may, upon invocation of mutual aid agreements with other states, accompany state employees at host state or federal expense on out-of-state services.

When called into active service by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management, members of the cadre shall be under the operational and administrative management of the division and such employees of that office who may be designated to supervise their duties.

The director shall have the authority to immediately relieve members of the cadre for actual misconduct, perceived incompetence, or inability to perform their assigned duties.

When relieved by authority other than the director's, members shall have the right of appeal to the director for reinstatement.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1), (b), and (e).

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “responder” for “services” and “12-75-129” for “12-75-127.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1) and (e); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and (e).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1).

A.C.R.C. Notes. As to the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management superseding the Office of Fire Protection Services and the State Office of Hazardous Materials, see §12-75-109.

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 634, § 12: Mar. 14, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that due to the potential danger posed to the citizens of the State of Arkansas by the transport and storage of hazardous materials within the State of Arkansas it has been found and declared by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to implement the provisions of this act in the interests of public safety and welfare. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1995, No. 115, § 4; 1995 No. 169, § 4; 1999, No. 646, §§ 51-53; 2009, No. 165, § 59; 2019, No. 910, §§
5914–5916.

12-83-105. Reimbursement.

(1)Any persons seeking enrollment into the Emergency Volunteer Reserve Cadre shall be notified that no salary, retainer, emoluments, or other monetary reimbursement shall be made for their services, except reimbursement for food, lodging, and travel utilizing a privately owned vehicle when so authorized by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management.

Reimbursement shall be made in accordance with current state travel rules and at the prescribed rates in effect at the time of their services.

However, this shall not disqualify any persons from future employment as emergency hires or full-time employees when hired through the prescribed state employment procedures applicable to the positions they are seeking.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 115, § 4; 1995, No. 169, § 4; 2019, No. 315, §
976; 2019, No. 910, §
5917.